Maryland, session 2025, HB0359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–406.
(A) BEGINNING IN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, THE PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION SHALL REQUIRE EACH PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL
REQUIRED TO ESTABLISH A CHILD CARE CENTER UNDER § 9.5–5A–01 OF THIS
ARTICLE TO OFFER A CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION PROGRAM IN EARLY
CHILDHOOD EDUCATION THAT PREPARES STUDENTS FOR ADDITIONAL EDUCATION
AND CAREERS IN EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION AND CARE.
(B) THE EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION PROGRAM SHALL BE:
(1) ALIGNED WITH ANY STANDARDS FOR CAREER AND TECHNICAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS AS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) AVAILABLE TO ANY STUDENT ATTENDING THE SCHOOL.
SUBTITLE 5A. CHILD CARE CENTERS IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY PUBLIC
HIGH SCHOOLS.
9.5–5A–01.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION,
BEGINNING IN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
BOARD OF EDUCATION SHALL ESTABLISH A CHILD CARE CENTER IN EACH PUBLIC
HIGH SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE PREGNANCY RATE AMONG STUDENTS
IS GREATER THAN 1%.
(B) (1) A CHILD CARE CENTER ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
SHALL:
(I) ENROLL ONLY THE CHILDREN OF STUDENTS WHO:
1. ACTIVELY ATTEND A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL IN
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY; AND

HOUSE BILL 359 3
2. REGISTER TO RECEIVE SERVICES WITH CHILD
RESOURCE CONNECT IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY; AND
(II) PROVIDE SERVICES AT NO COST TO STUDENTS AND THEIR
FAMILIES.
(2) IF A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL LACKS SUFFICIENT SPACE TO
ESTABLISH A CHILD CARE CENTER AS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION SHALL, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE,
ARRANGE FOR ANY STUDENTS ATTENDING THE SCHOOL AND THEIR CHILDREN TO
BE TRANSPORTED TO ANOTHER SCHOOL WITH A CHILD CARE CENTER.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ASSIST THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY
BOARD OF EDUCATION IN CARRYING OUT THIS SECTION BY:
(1) PROVIDING FOR THE LICENSING OF CHILD CARE CENTERS
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(2) ENSURING THE SPACE DESIGNATED WITHIN A PUBLIC HIGH
SCHOOL OR NEARBY BUILDINGS FOR A CHILD CARE CENTER COMPLIES WITH THE
PREVAILING LOCAL AND STATE SAFETY BUILDING CODES FOR CHILD CARE
CENTERS; AND
(3) APPLYING THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER SUBTITLE 4 OF
THIS TITLE FOR CHILD CARE CENTERS.
(D) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF
$5,000,000 TO THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION TO:
(1) CARRY OUT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) PROVIDE GRANTS TO CHILD RESOURCE CONNECT IN PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY FOR THE SERVICES PROVIDED TO STUDENTS WHO REGISTER AS
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1)(I)2 OF THIS SECTION.
Article – Family Law
12–103.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.

HOUSE BILL 359
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE COURT IN
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY SHALL COLLECT A FEE OF $10 IN ANY CASE IN WHICH
AN INDIVIDUAL:
(1) APPLIES FOR A DECREE OR MODIFICATION OF A DECREE OF CHILD
SUPPORT; OR
(2) FILES ANY FORM OF PROCEEDING TO RECOVER ARREARAGES OF
OR TO ENFORCE A DECREE OF CHILD SUPPORT.
(C) THE REVENUE GENERATED FROM THE FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL BE REMITTED QUARTERLY TO THE COUNTY AND USED TO SUPPORT
CHILD CARE CENTERS IN THE COUNTY, AS DEFINED IN § 9.5–101 OF THE EDUCATION
ARTICLE.
(D) THE FEE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION IS IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER
FEES OR COSTS IMPOSED UNDER LAW, REGULATION, OR RULE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.